Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 12

Local Governments

12-3-1201. Purchases for local governmental units.

The central procurement office may, upon request, purchase goods and services for any county, city, municipality, special district, school district, other local governmental unit of the state, or quasi-governmental entity organized under a city, municipality, or county. The purchases shall be made on the same terms and under the same rules and regulations as now provided for the purchase of goods and services by the central procurement office. The cost of any purchase made pursuant to this section shall be borne by the local governmental unit concerned. The central procurement office has the power to promulgate all rules and regulations necessary for the operation of this section, subject to the approval of the procurement commission.

It is the intent of this section that the central procurement office advise local governments of the benefits to be derived from the use of the purchasing procedures authorized herein. Where any local or private act, charter, or general law requires that a local governmental unit purchase by competitive procurement method, the local unit of government may, notwithstanding the local or private act, charter, or general law, purchase, without public advertisement or competitive soliciting, under contracts or price agreements entered into by the central procurement office.

To the extent permitted by federal law or regulations, local governments may make purchases of goods, except motor vehicles other than those manufactured for a special purpose as defined in § 12-3-1208, or services included in federal general service administration contracts or other applicable federal open purchase contracts either directly or through the appropriate state agency; provided, that no purchase under this section shall be made at a price higher than that which is contained in the contract between the general services administration and the vendor affected.

Except as provided in subdivision (d)(5), when any local or private act, charter, or general law requires that a local governmental unit purchase by competitive soliciting, the local unit of government may, notwithstanding the local or private act, charter, or general law, purchase, without public advertisement or competitive soliciting, any item from local sources if such item is available for purchase under contracts or price agreements entered into by the central procurement office, and such item is available at the same or lower cost from such local sources. This subsection (d) shall apply only in cases where the local governmental entity is not permitted to purchase from an existing contract established by the central procurement office. Any item purchased locally must be of equal or better specifications than the item under the competitive contract.

The legislative body of a county by resolution or a municipality by ordinance may establish and adopt a program to encourage participation in government purchasing programs by minority-owned businesses. Such programs may include set-aside provisions which conform to federal law.

This subsection (d) shall be permissive relative to sellers of motor vehicles.

This subsection (d) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the local legislative body and such approval is filed with the comptroller of the treasury.

This subsection (d) does not apply in a county having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), or in a county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1970, ch. 410, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 571, § 1; modified; T.C.A., §§ 12-338,12-3-401; Acts 1985, ch. 400, § 1; 1997, ch. 246, § 1; 1997, ch. 335, §§ 1-6; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19; T.C.A. §12-3-1001; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 68; 2018, ch. 724, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 12, §§12-3-1201,12-3-1202, concerning the purchase of computers and other electronic devices, was transferred to §12-3-1211, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 10, §§12-3-1001 —12-7-1012, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 68-70, effective July 1, 2013.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability of statutes pertaining to public purchasing and public contracting, and governing general contractors, to housing authorities established by municipalities or counties pursuant to T.C.A. §§13-20-101 et seq., OAG 05-170, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 172 (11/21/05).

12-3-1202. Purchase of secondhand articles or equipment by municipalities or counties.

Notwithstanding any charter, private act, or general law requirements, any municipality or any county may purchase used or secondhand articles consisting of goods, equipment, materials, supplies, or commodities from any federal, state, or local governmental unit or agency without public advertisement and competitive soliciting.

Notwithstanding any charter, private act, or general law requirements, any municipality or any county may purchase used or secondhand articles consisting of goods, equipment, materials, supplies, or commodities from any private individual or entity without public advertisement and competitive soliciting as long as the purchasing government documents the general range of value of the purchased item through a listing in a nationally recognized publication or through an appraisal by a licensed appraiser, and the price is not more than five percent (5%) higher than the highest value of the documented range.

Acts 1984, ch. 765, § 7; 2007, ch. 383, § 1; 2010, ch. 955, § 1; T.C.A. §12-3-1003; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 69.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 12, §§12-3-1201,12-3-1202, concerning the purchase of computers and other electronic devices, was transferred to §12-3-1211, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 10, §§12-3-1001 —12-7-1012, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 68-70, effective July 1, 2013.

12-3-1203. Purchases for other local governmental units.

Any municipality, county, utility district, or other local governmental unit of the state may, upon request, purchase supplies, equipment, and services for any other municipality, county, utility district, or other local governmental unit.

The purchases shall be made on the same terms and under the same rules and regulations as regular purchases of the purchasing entity.

The cost of the purchase shall be borne by the local government for which the purchase was made.

Where the local government making the request is required to advertise and receive bids, it shall be sufficient for those purposes that the purchasing entity comply only with its own purchasing requirements.

Any local education agency (LEA) may purchase equipment under the same terms of a legal bid initiated by any other LEA in Tennessee.

Any LEA may purchase directly from a vendor the same equipment at the same price and under the same terms as provided in a contract for such equipment entered into by any other LEA.

Any LEA which purchases equipment under this subsection (b) shall directly handle payment, refunds, returns, and any other communications or requirements involved in the purchase of the equipment without involving the LEA which originated the contract. The originating LEA shall have no liability or responsibility for any purchases made by another LEA under a contract which the originating LEA negotiated and consummated.

Any municipality, county, utility district, or other local governmental unit of this state may purchase supplies, goods, equipment, and services under contracts or price agreements entered into by any other local governmental unit of this state. Such purchases shall be made on the same terms and under the same rules and regulations as regular purchases of the purchasing entity. Any local governmental unit that purchases supplies, goods, equipment, or services under this section shall directly handle payment, refunds, returns, and any other communication or requirements involved in the purchase without involving the local governmental unit that originated the contract. The originating local governmental unit shall have no liability or responsibility for any purchases made by another local governmental unit under a contract that the originating local governmental unit negotiated and consummated. Where any local or private act, charter, or general law requires that a local governmental unit purchase by competitive bidding, the local governmental unit may, notwithstanding the local or private act, charter, or general law, purchase without public advertisement or competitive bidding in accordance with this section.

This subsection (c) shall not apply to:

Purchases of new or unused motor vehicles, unless the motor vehicles are manufactured for a special purpose as defined in § 12-3-1208; and

Purchases related to any transportation infrastructure project, including, but not limited to, projects for the construction or improvement of streets, highways, bridges, tunnels, or any roadway related facility.

Acts 1984, ch. 765, § 7; 2003, ch. 228, § 1; 2010, ch. 1067, § 2; 2012, ch. 600, §§ 1-3; 2013, ch. 329, § 1; T.C.A. §12-3-1004; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 68.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 12, §§12-3-1201,12-3-1202, concerning the purchase of computers and other electronic devices, was transferred to §12-3-1211, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 10, §§12-3-1001 —12-7-1012, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 68-70, effective July 1, 2013.

Attorney General Opinions. It would be possible for a local sheriff's office and a school board to combine their food procurement bids in order to take advantage of the higher total purchase amount so that both local governmental entities save money. OAG 15-31, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 31 (4/2/15).

12-3-1204. Competitive solicitation.

As used in this section, “municipality,” “county,” and “metropolitan government” apply only to municipalities, counties, and metropolitan governments with a population greater than one hundred fifty thousand (150,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

In any municipality, county, or metropolitan government, notwithstanding any charter provision, private act, or other provision of law, a purchase, lease, or lease-purchase must be preceded by competitive solicitation only if the purchase, lease, or lease-purchase exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

When the charter of a metropolitan government requires that purchases be made on the basis of competitive bidding, notwithstanding subsection (b), “competitive soliciting” for the metropolitan government means:

Dollar Amount of Purchase Requirement

$1,000 to $3,999.99 Three (3) verbal (including telephone) quotations when possible.

$4,000 to $9,999.99 Three (3) written (including fax) quotations when possible.

$10,000 and above Competitive sealed bids or proposals for nonemergency and nonproprietary product purchases.

Any municipality, county, or metropolitan government may retain present competitive soliciting requirements and may retain the right to establish, in accordance with charter amendment or private act, whichever is applicable, different dollar amount thresholds and different requirements for competitive bids and competitive proposals from those established in this section.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to expressly or impliedly repeal § 7-52-117, or any part of that section.

This section shall not supersede or be construed to supersede § 12-3-1201.

Acts 1995, ch. 176, § 1; T.C.A. §12-3-1007; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 70.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 12, §§12-3-1201,12-3-1202, concerning the purchase of computers and other electronic devices, was transferred to §12-3-1211, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 10, §§12-3-1001 —12-7-1012, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 68-70, effective July 1, 2013.

For tables of populations of Tennessee municipalities and U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

12-3-1205. Cooperative purchasing agreements.

Any municipality, county, utility district, or other local government of the state may participate in, sponsor, conduct or administer a cooperative purchasing agreement for the procurement of any supplies, services or construction with one (1) or more other local governments in accordance with an agreement entered into between the participants. Such cooperative purchasing may include, but is not limited to, joint or multi-party contracts between local governments. Where the participants in a joint or multi-party contract are required to advertise and receive bids, it shall be sufficient for those purposes that the purchasing entity comply only with its own purchasing requirements.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any municipality, county, utility district, or other local government of the state may participate in, sponsor, conduct, or administer a cooperative purchasing agreement for the procurement of any goods, supplies, services, or equipment with one (1) or more other governmental entities outside this state, to the extent the laws of the other state permit the joint exercise of purchasing authority, or with an agency of the United States, to the extent federal law permits the joint exercise of purchasing authority, in accordance with an agreement entered into between or among the participants; provided, such goods, supplies, services, or equipment were procured in a manner that constitutes competitive bidding and were advertised, evaluated, and awarded by a governmental entity and made available for use by other governmental entities.

A municipality, county, utility district, or other local government of the state may participate in a master agreement by adopting a resolution accepting the terms of the master agreement. If a participant in a joint or multi-party agreement is required to advertise and receive bids, then it will be deemed sufficient for those purposes that the purchasing entity or the entity that procured the bid complied with its own purchasing requirements. The participant shall acquire and maintain documentation that the purchasing entity or entities that procured the bid complied with its own purchasing requirements.

The powers conferred by this section are in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law, and any limitations imposed by this section shall not affect powers conferred by any other law.

This subsection (b) does not apply to:

Purchases of new or unused motor vehicles, unless the motor vehicles are manufactured for a special purpose as defined in § 12-3-1208. As used in this subdivision (b)(4)(A), “motor vehicle” does not include a farm tractor, mower, earth-moving machinery, construction machinery, or other similar machinery or equipment;

Purchases of construction, engineering, or architectural services, or construction materials. As used in this subdivision (b)(4)(B), “construction materials” does not include materials used in the operation of a municipal utility system, including, but not limited to, transformers, conductors, insulators, poles, cross-arms, anchors, pipes, valves, meters, or other components or parts of a utility system, whether purchased in accordance with a purchasing agreement with the Tennessee Valley authority or another purchasing arrangement; or

Purchases of fuel, fuel products, and lubricating oils.

The authorization for exercising joint purchasing authority with an agency of the United States under subdivision (b)(1) does not include the authority to purchase construction machinery, including, but not limited to, bulldozers and other heavy equipment utilized in construction or on construction sites.

The chief procurement officer may collect information from municipalities, counties, utility districts, or any other local government unit concerning the type, cost, quality, and quantity of commonly used goods, supplies, services, or equipment being procured under cooperative purchasing agreements. The chief procurement officer may make available all such information to any municipality, county, utility district, or other local government unit upon request.

Acts 1999, ch. 382, § 4; 2010, ch. 1067, § 1; 2011, ch. 152, § 1; 2013, ch. 329, § 3; T.C.A. §12-3-1009; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 70; 2016, ch. 935, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 574, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 12, §§12-3-1201,12-3-1202, concerning the purchase of computers and other electronic devices, was transferred to §12-3-1211, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 10, §§12-3-1001 —12-7-1012, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 68-70, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2016, ch. 935, § 3 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to cooperative purchasing agreements entered into on or after July 1, 2016.

12-3-1206. Transfer of assets for fire protection.

Notwithstanding any other law, a county, municipality and metropolitan government may transfer the ownership of assets for fire protection purchased through or with the proceeds of federal, state or local grants to volunteer fire departments within such county, municipality or metropolitan area; provided, that such volunteer fire departments are registered as nonprofit organizations with the office of the secretary of state.

This section shall have no effect in a county, municipality or metropolitan area unless it is approved by the appropriate legislative body.

Acts 2000, ch. 604, § 1; T.C.A. §12-3-1010; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 70.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 12, §§12-3-1201,12-3-1202, concerning the purchase of computers and other electronic devices, was transferred to §12-3-1211, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 10, §§12-3-1001 —12-7-1012, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 68-70, effective July 1, 2013.

Attorney General Opinions. Donation of assets to volunteer fire service, OAG 07-087, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 134 (6/5/07).

12-3-1207. Authorization to use competitive sealed proposals.

Any municipality may use competitive sealed proposals to purchase goods and services rather than competitive sealed bids when the municipal governing body, acting under the restrictions and requirements of this section and a procurement code adopted by the governing body, determines that the use of competitive sealed bidding is either not practicable or not advantageous to the municipality. In actual emergencies caused by unforeseen circumstances, such as natural or human-made disasters, delays by contractors, delays in transportation, or unanticipated volume of work, purchases through competitive sealed proposals may be made without specific authorizing action of the municipal governing body. A record of any emergency purchase shall be made by the person or body authorizing the emergency purchase, specifying the amount paid, the items and services purchased, from whom the purchase was made, and the nature of the emergency. A report of the emergency purchase through competitive sealed proposals containing all relevant information shall be made as soon as possible by the person or body authorizing the purchase to the municipal governing body.

In the decision to use competitive sealed proposals, the governing body shall follow a procurement code, which shall be adopted by the municipality by ordinance before purchases may be made under this section. The code shall contain criteria for purchasing through competitive sealed proposals and procedures consistent with this section.

The procurement code shall provide that competitive sealed proposals may be used only when qualifications, experience, or competence are more important than price in making the purchase and:

When there is more than one (1) solution to a purchasing issue and the competitive sealed proposals will assist in choosing the best solution; or

When there is no readily identifiable solution to a purchasing issue and the competitive sealed proposals will assist in identifying one (1) or more solutions.

The municipal technical advisory service of the University of Tennessee's institute for public service, in conjunction with the comptroller of the treasury's office, shall develop a model procurement code that may be adopted by any municipality to guide the governing body and purchasing agent in making purchases through requests for competitive sealed proposals. The model procurement code shall contain provisions allowing an aggrieved respondent to protest the intended award to another respondent if the protest is filed within seven (7) calendar days after the intended award is announced. The protest shall be filed with and decided by the municipal governing body.

Adequate public notice of the request for competitive sealed proposals shall be given in the same manner provided for competitive sealed bids.

Competitive sealed proposals shall be opened in a manner that avoids disclosure of contents to competing respondents during the negotiation. The proposals shall be open for public inspection after the intent to award the contract to a particular respondent is announced.

The request for competitive sealed proposals shall state the relative importance of price and other evaluation factors.

As provided in the request for competitive sealed proposals and in the procurement code, discussions may be conducted for clarification to assure full understanding of, and responsiveness to, the solicitation requirements with responsible respondents who submit proposals determined by the purchasing agent to be reasonably susceptible of being selected. These respondents shall be accorded fair and equal treatment with respect to any opportunity for discussion and revision of proposals, and revisions may be permitted after submission and before the intent to award to a particular respondent is announced to obtain the best and final offers. In conducting discussions, the purchasing agent and other municipal personnel may make no disclosure to any respondent of any information derived from proposals submitted by competing respondents.

The award shall be made to the responsible respondent whose proposal the governing body determines is the most advantageous to the municipality, taking into consideration price and the evaluation factors set out in the request for competitive sealed proposals. No other factor may be used in the evaluation. The purchasing agent shall place in the contract file a statement containing the basis on which the award was made.

A governmental utility board shall have the same rights and be subject to the same restrictions and requirements as apply to a municipal governing body under this section. The governmental utility board shall adopt a procurement code by resolution before purchases may be made under this section.

For purposes of subdivision (j)(1), a “governmental utility board” includes a board of public utilities created under title 7, chapter 52, and shall also include any other county, metropolitan government or municipal utility board or supervisory body created by private act, home rule charter or local ordinance or resolution.

Nothing in this subsection (j) shall otherwise modify or impair any limitations on the contracting power of the governmental utility boards as the powers may exist under applicable law.

Acts 2007, ch. 583, § 1; T.C.A. §12-3-1011; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 68.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 12, §§12-3-1201,12-3-1202, concerning the purchase of computers and other electronic devices, was transferred to §12-3-1211, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 10, §§12-3-1001 —12-7-1012, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 68-70, effective July 1, 2013.

12-3-1208. Reverse auctions by local governmental units.

As used in this section, “local governmental unit” means and includes a county, city, municipality, special district, utility district, school district, authority or any other entity created or appointed by a local governmental unit of the state.

For a purchase of goods or services, any local governmental unit may purchase goods or services through a competitive reverse auction process that allows offerors to bid on specified goods or services electronically and adjust bid pricing during a specified time period.

This section shall not apply to:

Construction services, other than those relating to maintenance, repairs and renovations, the cost of which is less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000);

Architectural or engineering services;

New or unused motor vehicles, unless the motor vehicles are manufactured for a special purpose. “Manufactured for a special purpose” includes, but is not limited to, school buses, buses with capacity exceeding twenty-two (22) passengers used to provide public transportation, garbage trucks, fire trucks or ambulances; or

New or unused construction equipment.

The purchasing agent of the local governmental unit shall solicit bids by public notice inserted at least once in a newspaper of countywide circulation five (5) calendar days prior to the first day bids can be submitted. If the county in question has no newspaper with countywide circulation, the purchasing agent shall post notices on a public bulletin board in the county courthouse. The purchasing agent may also solicit bid requests by mail to prospective bidders or by distributing invitations to bid electronically via email or by posting on the entity's website. All invitations to bid shall include a general description of the goods or services to be purchased and information related to the time and place of opening bids.

In order to assure the fullest possible participation of small businesses and minority-owned businesses, a local governmental unit shall provide a mechanism either through the local governmental unit itself or through a third party, if a third party source is utilized to conduct the reverse auction, to facilitate participation of small and minority-owned businesses in a reverse auction.

All bid responses received shall be made available publicly at the time and place identified in the invitation to bid. An award shall be made to the offeror determined to be the lowest responsible and responsive bidder at the close of the specified bid period. Each bid, with the name and address of the bidder, shall be recorded and the names of the bidders, the amounts of their bids and the name of the successful bidder shall, after the award, be open to public inspection. All bids should be preserved for a period of sixty (60) months.

Prior to the initial utilization of a reverse auction, the local governmental unit shall file a plan with the comptroller of the treasury. The plan shall indicate the technology to be utilized, whether a third party source will be utilized to conduct a reverse auction or auctions, a description of policies and procedures related to the implementation of the reverse auction process and documentation of internal controls that will ensure the integrity of the process.

The plan shall also indicate whether such a process will be implemented within the existing operating resources of the local governmental unit or indicate prior approval of the governing body of the local governmental unit if additional operating resources are needed.

Acts 2009, ch. 399, § 1; 2013, ch. 329, § 6; T.C.A. §12-3-1012; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 70.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 12, §§12-3-1201,12-3-1202, concerning the purchase of computers and other electronic devices, was transferred to §12-3-1211, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 10, §§12-3-1001 —12-7-1012, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 68-70, effective July 1, 2013.

12-3-1209. Requirements of professional persons or groups providing legal services, fiscal agent, financial advisor, advisory or consultant services covered by this part.

Contracts by counties, cities, metropolitan governments, towns, utility districts and other municipal and public corporations of the state, for legal services, fiscal agent, financial advisor or advisory services, educational consultant services, and similar services by professional persons or groups of high ethical standards, shall not be based upon competitive solicitations, but shall be awarded on the basis of recognized competence and integrity. The prohibition against competitive soliciting in this section shall not prohibit any entity enumerated from interviewing eligible persons or entities to determine the capabilities of such persons or entities.

Any person providing fiscal agent, financial advisor or advisory services to any county, city, metropolitan government, town, utility district or other municipal or public corporation shall perform such services only pursuant to a written contract, specifying the services to be rendered, the costs therefore, and the expenses to be covered under such contract.

Any person providing fiscal agent, financial advisor or advisory services to any county, city, metropolitan government, town, utility district or other municipal or public corporation of this state who desires to bid, directly or indirectly, on any bonds, notes or other obligations of such entity sold pursuant to public, competitive sale shall receive in writing prior to the sale the permission of such entity to respond either directly or indirectly on the obligations.

For the purposes of this section, “providing fiscal agent, financial advisor or advisory services” means a relationship that exists when a person renders or enters into an agreement to render financial advisory or consultant services to or on behalf of an issuer with respect to a new issue or issues of municipal securities, including advice with respect to the structure, timing, terms and other similar matters concerning such issue or issues, for a fee or other compensation or in expectation of such compensation for the rendering of such services. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subsection (d), a financial advisory relationship shall not be deemed to exist when, in the course of acting as an underwriter, a municipal securities dealer renders advice to an issuer, including advice with respect to the structure, timing, terms and other similar matters concerning a new issue of municipal securities.

Contracts by counties, cities, metropolitan governments, towns, utility districts and other municipal and public corporations of the state for information management services, including, but not limited to, computer program analyst services shall, upon approval by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body, be procured through a request for proposals process. The request for proposals process will invite prospective respondents to participate and will indicate the service requirements and the factors used for evaluating the proposals. Such factors shall include cost, the vendor's qualifications and any additional factor or factors deemed relevant by the procuring entity for the procurement of the service. Cost shall not be the sole criterion for evaluation. The contract for such services will be awarded to the best evaluated, responsive respondent.

This subsection (e) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than four hundred seventy thousand (470,000) nor more than four hundred eighty thousand (480,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 70.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 12, §§12-3-1201,12-3-1202, concerning the purchase of computers and other electronic devices, was transferred to §12-3-1211, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 10, §§12-3-1001 —12-7-1012, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 68-70, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-4-106 were transferred to this section.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Under T.C.A. §§29-20-407 and12-3-1209, a local governmental entity may only purchase liability insurance without the necessity of any legally required public bidding if the liability insurance is purchased through a plan authorized and approved by any organization of governmental entities representing cities and counties. OAG 13-65, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 68 (8/23/13).

12-3-1210. Authority of the Tennessee board of regents system and the University of Tennessee system.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Tennessee board of regents system and the University of Tennessee system are authorized to:

Develop procedures to apply the policy of § 12-3-701 to their constituent institutions, including procedures describing the circumstances in which limitations below two (2) times the value of the contract are permitted and procedures for obtaining permission from the appropriate official of the Tennessee board of regents or the University of Tennessee;

Purchase software for use restricted solely to academic teaching or research upon terms that may limit the contractor's liability or warranties; provided, that in no event, shall the liability of the contractor be limited for intentional torts, criminal acts or fraudulent conduct; and

Acquire software or services, materials, supplies and equipment free or at nominal cost upon terms that may limit the contractor's liability or warranties; provided, that in no event, shall the liability of the contractor be limited for intentional torts, criminal acts or fraudulent conduct.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 70.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 12, §§12-3-1201,12-3-1202, concerning the purchase of computers and other electronic devices, was transferred to §12-3-1211, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 10, §§12-3-1001 —12-7-1012, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 68-70, effective July 1, 2013.

12-3-1211. Contracts for the purchase of personal computers and related devices by public school teachers.

The central procurement office may establish contracts for the purchase of personal computers and related devices by public school teachers for use outside the classroom. The computers and related devices shall not be purchased with public funds, but shall be paid for and owned by teachers individually. The contracts shall be established in accordance with this chapter.

The central procurement office shall promulgate rules to regulate the purchases authorized in this section. The rules shall be approved by the procurement commission.

Acts 2001, ch. 207, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19; 2013, ch. 403, § 70; T.C.A. §§12-3-1201,12-3-1202.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 12, §§12-3-1201,12-3-1202, concerning the purchase of computers and other electronic devices, was transferred to §12-3-1211, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 10, §§12-3-1001 —12-7-1012, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 68-70, effective July 1, 2013.

12-3-1212. Resolution or ordinance to increase threshold amount for requiring public advertisement and competitive bidding.

Notwithstanding any charter provision, private act, or other law to the contrary, any county, municipality, utility district, LEA in accordance with §49-2-203(a), or other local governmental entity having centralized purchasing authority with a full-time purchasing agent is authorized, by resolution or ordinance of its governing body, to increase the threshold over which public advertisement and sealed competitive bids or proposals are required to an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for nonemergency, nonproprietary purchases. At least three (3) written quotations shall be required whenever possible for purchases costing less than the bid threshold established for public advertisement and sealed competitive bids or proposals but more than forty percent (40%) of such bid threshold or some lower amount as may be established by the governing body in the resolution. Purchases of like items shall be aggregated for purposes of the bid threshold.

Acts 2015, ch. 457, § 1; 2017, ch. 415, § 1.